Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.360

Basis for appointment of conservator.

(1) On petition and after notice and hearing, the court may appoint a conservator for the property or financial affairs of a minor if the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that appointment of a conservator is in the minor's best interest, and:

(a) If the minor has a parent, the court gives weight to any recommendation of the parent whether an appointment is in the minor's best interest; and

(b) Either:

(i) The minor owns funds or other property requiring management or protection that otherwise cannot be provided;

(ii) The minor has or may have financial affairs that may be put at unreasonable risk or hindered because of the minor's age; or

(iii) Appointment is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds or other property needed for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor.

(2) On petition and after notice and hearing, the court may appoint a conservator for the property or financial affairs of an adult if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) The adult is unable to manage property or financial affairs because:

(i) Of a limitation in the adult's ability to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with the use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making; or

(ii) The adult is missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States;

(b) Appointment is necessary to:

(i) Avoid harm to the adult or significant dissipation of the property of the adult; or

(ii) Obtain or provide funds or other property needed for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the adult or of an individual entitled to the adult's support; and

(c) The adult's identified needs cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternatives.

(3) The court shall grant a conservator only those powers necessitated by demonstrated limitations and needs of the respondent and issue orders that will encourage development of the respondent's maximum self-determination and independence. The court may not establish a full conservatorship if a limited conservatorship, protective arrangement instead of conservatorship, or other less restrictive alternative would meet the needs of the respondent.

(4) A determination by the court that a basis under subsection (2) of this section exists for the appointment of a conservator for an adult and on the issue of the rights that will be retained or restricted by the appointment of a conservator is a legal, not a medical decision. The determination must be based on demonstrated management insufficiencies over time in the area of property or financial affairs. Age, eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone are not a sufficient basis under subsection (2) of this section to justify a determination that a conservator should be appointed for the respondent.

(5) For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, an adult who resides in a long-term care facility, resides in another care setting, or is the subject of an involuntary commitment order is not considered missing or detained.

[ 2020 c 312 s 209; 2019 c 437 s 401.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.